apertium-mfe-en.en.dix
		<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
			<e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>d</l> <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l>d</l><r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ving</l><r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="ha/ve__vblex">
			<e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>d</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>d</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ving</l><r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="her__det">
			<e r="LR"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

	  	<pardef n="house__n">
	    	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  	</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="liv/e__vblex">
			<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ed</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ed</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ing</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="li/fe__n">
			<e><p><l>fe</l><r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ves</l><r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="long/__adj">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>er</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>est</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="many__det">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="Mauritius__np">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="maybe__adv">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="much__det">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="nice/__adj">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>r</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>st</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="politics__n">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="second__adj">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
			<e><p><l>ake</l><r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ake</l><r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>akes</l> <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ook</l><r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aken</l><r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>aking</l><r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="th/at__det">
			<e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ose</l> <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="th/at__prn">
			<e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ose</l><r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="th/is__det">
			<e><p><l>is</l> <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ese</l><r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="th/is__prn">
			<e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ese</l><r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="that__rel">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="the__det">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="very__preadv">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="what__det">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="what__prn">
			<e><p><l></l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	
	</pardefs>

  		<e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
  		<e lm="banana"><i>banana</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="beginning"><i>beginning</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="bird"><i>bird</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="chance"><i>chance</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="colonist"><i>colonist</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="deer"><i>deer</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="dodo"><i>dodo</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
		<e lm="dog"><i>dog</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  			<e lm="filao"><i>filao</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  			<e lm="summer"><i>flamboyant</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="example"><i>example</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="extremely"><i>extremely</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="fauna"><i>fauna</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="flower"><i>flower</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="frequently"><i>frequently</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="fruit"><i>fruit</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="guava"><i>guava</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
  		<e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="hedgehog"><i>hedgehog</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
 <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="insect"><i>insect</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="isolation"><i>isolation</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="its"><i>its</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="kestrel"><i>kestrel</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="kind"><i>kind</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="land"><i>land</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="last"><i>last</i><par n="second__adj"/></e>
	  	<e lm="left"><i>left</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
	  	<e lm="left"><i>left</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="life"><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="like"><i>lik</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="mammal"><i>mammal</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="mango"><i>mango</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="many"><i>many</i><par n="many__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="Mauritius"><i>Mauritius</i><par n="Mauritius__np"/></e>
  		<e lm="mauritian"><i>mauritian</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="monkey"><i>monkey</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="mollusc"><i>mollusc</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="more"><i>more</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
  		<e lm="more"><i>more</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="mostly"><i>mostly</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
	  	<e lm="much"><i>much</i><par n="much__det"/></e>
	  	<e lm="much"><i>much</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="near"><i>near</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="not"><i>not</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="nowadays"><i>nowadays</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
	  	<e lm="original"><i>original</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="pineapple"><i>pineapple</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="plant"><i>plant</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="rare"><i>rare</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="replace"><i>replac</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="rich"><i>rich</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="road"><i>road</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="shell"><i>shell</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="some"><i>some</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="souvenir"><i>souvenir</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="species"><i>species</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="summer"><i>summer</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="take"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
  		<e lm="that"><i>th</i><par n="th/at__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="that"><i>th</i><par n="th/at__prn"/></e>
	  	<e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
	  	<e lm="there"><i>there</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="this"><i>th</i><par n="th/is__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="this"><i>th</i><par n="th/is__prn"/></e>
  		<e lm="too"><i>too</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
  		<e lm="too"><i>too</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
  		<e lm="tree"><i>tree</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
	  	<e lm="vegetation"><i>vegetation</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
  		<e lm="very"><i>very</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
  		<e lm="wide"><i>wide</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
  		<e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="what__det"/></e>
  		<e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="what__prn"/></e>
  		<e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
  		<e lm="world"><i>world</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
